dictionaries/oc_FR/oc_FR.dic
abrògui/e	po:v1	di:*	id:577
acaumat/slD	di:*	id:57881
aciselèri/MTLQNd	di:*	id:964
acoissavi/MTLQNf	di:*	id:1059
acomòdi/MTLQNc	di:*	id:1105
adjonch/slD	di:*	id:58079
afevar/MTLQNb	di:*	id:1780
afondrar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:1943
afrabelèri/MTLQNd	di:*	id:1968
agavèli/MTLQNc	di:*	id:2174
agimbaire/slD	di:*	id:2198
albèrgui/e	di:*	id:2976
albinisme/slD	di:*	id:80465
alinhavi/MTLQNf	po:v1	di:*	id:62603
amador/slD	di:*	id:58432
Andilhac/DQl	po:pr.place.n.	di:*	id:67335
anexar/MTLQNb	di:*	id:4119
aniular/MTLQNa	di:*	id:4211
antifrasa/slD	di:*	id:80502
anuègi/MTLQNe	di:*	id:4377
apastèli/MTLQNc	di:*	id:4550
apatafiolèri/MTLQNd	di:*	id:4557
apatocavi/MTLQNf	di:*	id:4567
aplanaire/slD	di:*	id:4770
arenifèra/slD	di:*	id:59069
Arsac/DQl	po:pr.place.n.	di:*	id:67497
assètgi/MTLQNe	di:*	id:6208
assetiar/bh	di:*	id:6212
astronautica/slD	po:nom	is:fem	di:*	id:59261
atemporar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:6523
atierèri/MTLQNd	di:*	id:6633
atrachelèri/MTLQNc	di:*	id:6733
atroçavi/f	di:*	id:6804
Aurèlia/lD	po:prn	is:fem	di:*	id:57017
avantdarnièra/slD	po:adj	is:fem	ts:merid	di:*	id:7267
avògui/e	di:*	id:7470
bieissar/bh	di:*	id:9036
blasmar/ah	po:v1	di:*	id:72890
boscavi/f	di:*	id:10059
bòsqui/e	di:*	id:10094
botelèri/d	di:*	id:10132
breçòli/c	di:*	id:10381
cantorlar/ah	di:*	id:12002
capvirolar/bh	di:*	id:12220
charrarèri/d	di:*	id:16269
chimèrli/c	di:*	id:16365
clojavi/f	di:*	id:13518
clòsqui/e	di:*	id:13543
coissinar/ah	di:*	id:13855
concertar/bh	di:*	id:14381
crèbi/c	di:*	id:15647
creisserai/d	di:*	id:15669
crèugi/e	di:*	id:15795
croçavi/f	di:*	id:15873
damasquinar/ah	di:*	id:16624
desacotar/bh	di:*	id:17299
desacròqui/e	di:*	id:17310
desbadocavi/f	di:*	id:17531
descabdèli/c	di:*	id:17735
descadenar/ah	di:*	id:17756
descadencièri/d	di:*	id:17758
desclòqui/e	di:*	id:17931
desconsolar/bh	di:*	id:18054
desencrocavi/f	di:*	id:18385
desencròqui/e	di:*	id:18389
desengalòchi/c	di:*	id:18443
desenterrèri/d	di:*	id:18495
desgaissonar/ah	di:*	id:18683
desgetar/bh	di:*	id:18733
desluògui/e	di:*	id:18894
desmemoriavi/f	di:*	id:18967
despièissi/c	di:*	id:19289
despiucelèri/d	po:v1	di:*	id:65194
dessalivar/ah	di:*	id:19526
desselar/bh	di:*	id:19544
desuèlhi/e	di:*	id:19863
dissecavi/f	di:*	id:20270
dòrmi/c	po:v2	ts:merid	di:*	id:65306
ebrièri/MTLQNd	di:*	id:20731
electroluminescenta/slD	po:adj	is:fem	di:*	id:66670
embarginar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:21181
embendelar/MTLQNb	di:*	id:21316
embestèstii/e	di:*	id:21339
embrocavi/MTLQNf	di:*	id:21660
embufèqui/MTLQNe	di:*	id:21725
empeutaire/slD	di:*	id:22115
emprincípii/MTLQNc	di:*	id:22261
encabdelèri/MTLQNd	di:*	id:22355
encarcasselar/MTLQNb	di:*	id:22503
enchosclar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:23002
enfèrri/MTLQNc	di:*	id:23414
enfleumèri/MTLQNd	di:*	id:23487
enfresquierar/MTLQNb	di:*	id:23592
enfrocavi/MTLQNf	di:*	id:23600
englantina/slD	di:*	id:23918
englòrii/MTLQNe	di:*	id:23944
enlessar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:24227
ennoviavi/f	di:*	id:24299
entalòssi/MTLQNc	di:*	id:24751
enternar/MTLQNb	di:*	id:24820
entestèri/MTLQNd	di:*	id:24841
epilepsia/slDQ	po:nom	is:fem	di:*	id:75213
escaganhar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:25889
escarpeta/slD	di:*	id:26321
escorjavi/f	di:*	id:26858
escòtii/e	di:*	id:26952
escular/MTLQNb	di:*	id:27112
escuòli/MTLQNc	di:*	id:27122
esflotèri/MTLQNd	di:*	id:27231
espalmar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:27477
esperrecavi/MTLQNf	di:*	id:27891
espira/slD	di:*	id:28095
estornelar/MTLQNb	di:*	id:29136
estrenar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:29363
estudièri/MTLQNd	po:v1	di:*	id:29509
estúdii/SMTLQNc	po:v1	di:*	id:29510
etiopian/slD	po:adj	is:mas	ts:gent	di:*	id:29587
flòqui/e	di:*	id:31158
folhavi/f	di:*	id:31358
frustrar/ah	di:*	id:32053
gansolar/bh	di:*	id:32541
gemèli/c	di:*	id:33017
gigotèri/d	di:*	id:33180
immobilizar/SMTLQNa	po:v1	di:*	id:34495
impossibla/slD	po:adj	is:fem	di:*	id:57519
interrègne/slD	po:nom	is:mas	ip:zool	di:*	id:35139
interrogavi/f	po:v1	di:*	id:35143
ivernar/MTLQNb	po:v1	di:*	id:35425
jògui/e	po:v1	di:*	id:35604
legifèri/c	di:*	id:36284
levèri/d	di:*	id:36442
maquilhar/ah	di:*	id:37654
muselar/bh	di:*	id:39535
negociavi/f	di:*	id:39787
olfièri/d	di:*	id:40528
òlhi/MTLQNc	di:*	id:40541
oludar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:40586
onanista/slDQ	po:adj	is:inv	ip:sexe	di:*	id:72078
pèpii/e	di:*	id:42690
perseverar/bh	di:*	id:42946
pertocavi/f	di:*	id:42989
plechar/ah	di:*	id:43720
pòchi/c	di:*	id:43846
policièri/d	di:*	id:43959
radobar/bh	di:*	id:45758
reboar/azh	di:*	id:46458
rebombelèri/d	di:*	id:46495
rebordèli/c	di:*	id:46516
reboscavi/f	di:*	id:46528
recèrqui/e	po:v1	di:*	id:46753
regorjavi/f	di:*	id:47461
reïnterpretar/bh	po:v1	di:*	id:79795
reorientar/ah	po:v1	di:*	id:63888
rèqui/e	di:*	id:48192
respeitèri/d	di:*	id:48323
respièchi/c	po:v1	di:*	id:48333
s'abrigar/A	po:pron.v.	po:v1	di:*	id:49563
s'acapriciar/A	po:pron.v.	po:v1	di:*	id:86828
s'accelerar/b	po:pron.v.	po:v1	di:*	id:89262
s'acocholar/A	po:pron.v.	po:v1	di:*	id:49589
s'acopelar/A	po:pron.v.	po:v1	di:*	id:49600
s'acutorbar/A	po:pron.v.	po:v1	di:*	id:49611
s'afalenar/A	po:pron.v.	po:v1	di:*	id:49621
s'aglatir/A	po:pron.v.	po:v2	di:*	id:49644
s'alenquir/A	po:pron.v.	po:v2	di:*	id:49668
s'amorosir/A	po:pron.v.	po:v2	di:*	id:81409
s'aplatir/A	po:pron.v.	po:v2	di:*	id:86841
s'assimar/A	di:*	id:49756
s'aturar/A	di:*	id:81387
s'embresenar/A	di:*	id:83999
s'encarar/A	po:pron.v.	po:v1	di:*	id:89392
s'endurzir/A	di:*	id:81432
s'enganossir/A	di:*	id:81436
s'enquestar/A	po:pron.v.	po:v1	di:*	id:49892
s'entravar/A	po:pron.v.	po:v1	di:*	id:89405
s'esbosenar/A	po:v1	di:*	id:76586
s'esconilhar/A	di:*	id:49966
s'espautar/A	di:*	id:49995
s'estrantalar/A	di:*	id:50017
s'infatuar/A	di:*	id:84066
s'utilizar/A	po:pron.v.	po:v1	di:*	id:89161
saquetar/ah	di:*	id:50527
segavi/f	di:*	id:50901
sòldi/c	di:*	id:51694
solèri/d	di:*	id:51719
subdelègui/e	di:*	id:52164
tavelar/bh	di:*	id:53027
trasmejavi/f	di:*	id:54379
tremblòti/c	di:*	id:54558
trepar/ah	di:*	id:54627
tresluènhi/e	di:*	id:54685
trevèri/d	di:*	id:54805
usatgièr/slDQ	po:nom	po:adj	is:mas	di:*	id:55393
vexar/bh	po:v1	di:*	id:56037
